Utah statutes.
17B-1-119.   Duty to comply with local land use provisions.

A local district shall comply with Title 10, Chapter 9a, Municipal Land Use, Development, and Management Act, and Title 17, Chapter 27a, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act, as applicable, if a land use authority consults with or allows the local district to participate in any way in a land use authority's land use development review or approval process.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 309, 2013 General Session

